ctranslate-ol/frontend/dictionaries/dsb_DE.aff
FLAG num
SFX 315 Y 42
SFX 315 0 a .
SFX 315 0 až .
SFX 315 0 ažkuli .
SFX 315 0 e .
SFX 315 0 ego .
SFX 315 0 egož .
SFX 315 0 egožkuli .
SFX 315 0 ej .
SFX 315 0 eje .
SFX 315 0 ejež .
SFX 315 0 eježkuli .
SFX 315 0 eju .
SFX 315 0 ejuž .
SFX 315 0 ejužkuli .
SFX 315 0 ejž .
SFX 315 0 ejžkuli .
SFX 315 0 em .
SFX 315 0 emu .
SFX 315 0 emuž .
SFX 315 0 emužkuli .
SFX 315 0 emž .
SFX 315 0 emžkuli .
SFX 315 0 ež .
SFX 315 0 ežkuli .
SFX 315 0 i .
SFX 315 0 ich .
SFX 315 0 ichž .
SFX 315 0 ichžkuli .
SFX 315 0 im .
SFX 315 0 ima .
SFX 315 0 imaž .
SFX 315 0 imažkuli .
SFX 315 0 imi .
SFX 315 0 imiž .
SFX 315 0 imižkuli .
SFX 315 0 imž .
SFX 315 0 imžkuli .
SFX 315 0 iž .
SFX 315 0 ižkuli .
SFX 315 0 u .
SFX 315 0 už .
SFX 315 0 užkuli .
SFX 316 Y 42
SFX 316 0 a .
SFX 316 0 až .
SFX 316 0 ažkuli .
SFX 316 0 e .
SFX 316 0 ego .
SFX 316 0 egož .
SFX 316 0 egožkuli .
SFX 316 0 ej .
SFX 316 0 eje .
SFX 316 0 ejež .
SFX 316 0 eježkuli .
SFX 316 0 eju .
SFX 316 0 ejuž .
SFX 316 0 ejužkuli .
SFX 316 0 ejž .
SFX 316 0 ejžkuli .
SFX 316 0 em .
SFX 316 0 emu .
SFX 316 0 emuž .
SFX 316 0 emužkuli .
SFX 316 0 emž .
SFX 316 0 emžkuli .
SFX 316 0 ež .
SFX 316 0 ežkuli .
SFX 316 0 i .
SFX 316 0 ich .
SFX 316 0 ichž .
SFX 316 0 ichžkuli .
SFX 316 0 im .
SFX 316 0 ima .
SFX 316 0 imaž .
SFX 316 0 imažkuli .
SFX 316 0 imi .
SFX 316 0 imiž .
SFX 316 0 imižkuli .
SFX 316 0 imž .
SFX 316 0 imžkuli .
SFX 316 0 iž .
SFX 316 0 ižkuli .
SFX 316 0 u .
SFX 316 0 už .
SFX 316 0 užkuli .
SFX 317 Y 12
SFX 317 0 a .
SFX 317 0 ach .
SFX 317 0 am .
SFX 317 0 ami .
SFX 317 0 ej .
SFX 317 0 o .
SFX 317 0 oju .
SFX 317 0 om .
SFX 317 0 oma .
SFX 317 0 ow .
SFX 317 0 owu .
SFX 317 0 u .
SFX 318 Y 12
SFX 318 0 a .
SFX 318 0 ach .
SFX 318 0 am .
SFX 318 0 ami .
SFX 318 0 im .
SFX 318 0 o .
SFX 318 0 oju .
SFX 318 0 om .
SFX 318 0 oma .
SFX 318 0 ow .
SFX 318 0 owu .
SFX 318 0 u .
SFX 319 Y 13
SFX 319 0 a .
SFX 319 0 ach .
SFX 319 0 am .
SFX 319 0 ami .
SFX 319 0 ej .
SFX 319 0 o .
SFX 319 0 oju .
SFX 319 0 om .
SFX 319 0 oma .
SFX 319 0 ow .
SFX 319 0 owu .
SFX 319 0 u .
SFX 319 0 y .
SFX 320 Y 13
SFX 320 0 a .
SFX 320 0 ach .
SFX 320 0 am .
SFX 320 0 ami .
SFX 320 0 i .
SFX 320 0 im .
SFX 320 0 o .
SFX 320 0 oju .
SFX 320 0 om .
SFX 320 0 oma .
SFX 320 0 ow .
SFX 320 0 owu .
SFX 320 0 u .
SFX 321 Y 27
SFX 321 0 ach .
SFX 321 0 am .
SFX 321 0 ami .
SFX 321 0 e .
SFX 321 0 ech .
SFX 321 0 echmej .
SFX 321 0 echmy .
SFX 321 0 echu .
SFX 321 0 ešo .
SFX 321 0 eštej .
SFX 321 0 ešćo .
SFX 321 0 i .
SFX 321 0 mej .
SFX 321 0 my .
SFX 321 0 o .
SFX 321 0 om .
SFX 321 0 oma .
SFX 321 0 omej .
SFX 321 0 omy .
SFX 321 0 otej .
SFX 321 0 ow .
SFX 321 0 owu .
SFX 321 0 ośo .
SFX 321 0 oš .
SFX 321 0 tej .
SFX 321 0 u .
SFX 321 0 ćo .
SFX 322 Y 9
SFX 322 0 ach .
SFX 322 0 am .
SFX 322 0 ami .
SFX 322 0 oma .
SFX 322 0 ow .
SFX 322 0 owu .
SFX 322 0 u .
SFX 322 0 y .
SFX 322 0 ymi .
SFX 323 Y 11
SFX 323 0 a .
SFX 323 0 ach .
SFX 323 0 am .
SFX 323 0 ami .
SFX 323 0 e .
SFX 323 0 oma .
SFX 323 0 ow .
SFX 323 0 owu .
SFX 323 0 u .
SFX 323 0 y .
SFX 323 0 ymi .
SFX 324 Y 25
SFX 324 0 a .
SFX 324 0 ach .
SFX 324 0 am .
SFX 324 0 ami .
SFX 324 0 e .
SFX 324 0 ego .
SFX 324 0 ej .
SFX 324 0 eje .
SFX 324 0 eju .
SFX 324 0 em .
SFX 324 0 emu .
SFX 324 0 i .
SFX 324 0 imej .
SFX 324 0 imy .
SFX 324 0 itej .
SFX 324 0 iśo .
SFX 324 0 oma .
SFX 324 0 ow .
SFX 324 0 owu .
SFX 324 0 u .
SFX 324 0 y .
SFX 324 0 ych .
SFX 324 0 ym .
SFX 324 0 yma .
SFX 324 0 ymi .
SFX 325 Y 39
SFX 325 0 ach .
SFX 325 0 achmej .
SFX 325 0 achmy .
SFX 325 0 achu .
SFX 325 0 am .
SFX 325 0 ami .
SFX 325 0 ašo .
SFX 325 0 aštej .
SFX 325 0 ašćo .
SFX 325 0 e .
SFX 325 0 ech .
SFX 325 0 echmej .
SFX 325 0 echmy .
SFX 325 0 echu .
SFX 325 0 ešo .
SFX 325 0 eštej .
SFX 325 0 ešćo .
SFX 325 0 i .
SFX 325 0 im .
SFX 325 0 imej .
SFX 325 0 imy .
SFX 325 0 itej .
SFX 325 0 iśo .
SFX 325 0 iš .
SFX 325 0 mej .
SFX 325 0 my .
SFX 325 0 o .
SFX 325 0 om .
SFX 325 0 oma .
SFX 325 0 omej .
SFX 325 0 omy .
SFX 325 0 otej .
SFX 325 0 ow .
SFX 325 0 owu .
SFX 325 0 ośo .
SFX 325 0 oš .
SFX 325 0 tej .
SFX 325 0 u .
SFX 325 0 ćo .
SFX 326 Y 27
SFX 326 0 a .
SFX 326 0 ach .
SFX 326 0 am .
SFX 326 0 ami .
SFX 326 0 e .
SFX 326 0 ego .
SFX 326 0 ej .
SFX 326 0 eje .
SFX 326 0 eju .
SFX 326 0 em .
SFX 326 0 emu .
SFX 326 0 i .
SFX 326 0 im .
SFX 326 0 imej .
SFX 326 0 imy .
SFX 326 0 itej .
SFX 326 0 iśo .
SFX 326 0 iš .
SFX 326 0 oma .
SFX 326 0 ow .
SFX 326 0 owu .
SFX 326 0 u .
SFX 326 0 y .
SFX 326 0 ych .
SFX 326 0 ym .
SFX 326 0 yma .
SFX 326 0 ymi .
SFX 327 Y 10
SFX 327 0 a .
SFX 327 0 e .
SFX 327 0 ej .
SFX 327 0 eje .
SFX 327 0 eju .
SFX 327 0 u .
SFX 327 0 ych .
SFX 327 0 ym .
SFX 327 0 yma .
SFX 327 0 ymi .
SFX 328 Y 11
SFX 328 0 a .
SFX 328 0 e .
SFX 328 0 ej .
SFX 328 0 eje .
SFX 328 0 eju .
SFX 328 0 i .
SFX 328 0 u .
SFX 328 0 ych .
SFX 328 0 ym .
SFX 328 0 yma .
SFX 328 0 ymi .
SFX 329 Y 27
SFX 329 0 e .
SFX 329 0 ech .
SFX 329 0 echmej .
SFX 329 0 echmy .
SFX 329 0 echu .
SFX 329 0 ešo .
SFX 329 0 eštej .
SFX 329 0 ešćo .
SFX 329 0 ijo .
SFX 329 0 ijom .
SFX 329 0 ijomej .
SFX 329 0 ijomy .
SFX 329 0 ijotej .
SFX 329 0 ijośo .
SFX 329 0 ijoš .
SFX 329 0 iju .
SFX 329 0 mej .
SFX 329 0 my .
SFX 329 0 o .
SFX 329 0 om .
SFX 329 0 omej .
SFX 329 0 omy .
SFX 329 0 otej .
SFX 329 0 ośo .
SFX 329 0 oš .
SFX 329 0 tej .
SFX 329 0 ćo .
SFX 330 Y 12
SFX 330 0 e .
SFX 330 0 mej .
SFX 330 0 my .
SFX 330 0 tej .
SFX 330 0 y .
SFX 330 0 ym .
SFX 330 0 ymej .
SFX 330 0 ymy .
SFX 330 0 ytej .
SFX 330 0 yśo .
SFX 330 0 yš .
SFX 330 0 ćo .
SFX 331 Y 42
SFX 331 0 a .
SFX 331 0 až .
SFX 331 0 ažkuli .
SFX 331 0 e .
SFX 331 0 ego .
SFX 331 0 egož .
SFX 331 0 egožkuli .
SFX 331 0 ej .
SFX 331 0 eje .
SFX 331 0 ejež .
SFX 331 0 eježkuli .
SFX 331 0 eju .
SFX 331 0 ejuž .
SFX 331 0 ejužkuli .
SFX 331 0 ejž .
SFX 331 0 ejžkuli .
SFX 331 0 em .
SFX 331 0 emu .
SFX 331 0 emuž .
SFX 331 0 emužkuli .
SFX 331 0 emž .
SFX 331 0 emžkuli .
SFX 331 0 ež .
SFX 331 0 ežkuli .
SFX 331 0 u .
SFX 331 0 už .
SFX 331 0 užkuli .
SFX 331 0 y .
SFX 331 0 ych .
SFX 331 0 ychž .
SFX 331 0 ychžkuli .
SFX 331 0 ym .
SFX 331 0 yma .
SFX 331 0 ymaž .
SFX 331 0 ymažkuli .
SFX 331 0 ymi .
SFX 331 0 ymiž .
SFX 331 0 ymižkuli .
SFX 331 0 ymž .
SFX 331 0 ymžkuli .
SFX 331 0 yž .
SFX 331 0 yžkuli .
SFX 332 Y 30
SFX 332 0 a .
SFX 332 0 ach .
SFX 332 0 am .
SFX 332 0 ami .
SFX 332 0 i .
SFX 332 0 ijo .
SFX 332 0 ijom .
SFX 332 0 ijomej .
SFX 332 0 ijomy .
SFX 332 0 ijotej .
SFX 332 0 ijośo .
SFX 332 0 ijoš .
SFX 332 0 iju .
SFX 332 0 im .
SFX 332 0 imej .
SFX 332 0 imy .
SFX 332 0 itej .
SFX 332 0 iśo .
SFX 332 0 iš .
SFX 332 0 mej .
SFX 332 0 my .
SFX 332 0 oju .
SFX 332 0 om .
SFX 332 0 oma .
SFX 332 0 ow .
SFX 332 0 owu .
SFX 332 0 tej .
SFX 332 0 u .
SFX 332 0 y .
SFX 332 0 śo .
SFX 333 Y 29
SFX 333 0 a .
SFX 333 0 e .
SFX 333 0 ego .
SFX 333 0 ej .
SFX 333 0 eje .
SFX 333 0 eju .
SFX 333 0 em .
SFX 333 0 emu .
SFX 333 0 i .
SFX 333 0 ijo .
SFX 333 0 ijom .
SFX 333 0 ijomej .
SFX 333 0 ijomy .
SFX 333 0 ijotej .
SFX 333 0 ijośo .
SFX 333 0 ijoš .
SFX 333 0 iju .
SFX 333 0 im .
SFX 333 0 imej .
SFX 333 0 imy .
SFX 333 0 itej .
SFX 333 0 iśo .
SFX 333 0 iš .
SFX 333 0 u .
SFX 333 0 y .
SFX 333 0 ych .
SFX 333 0 ym .
SFX 333 0 yma .
SFX 333 0 ymi .
SFX 334 Y 13
SFX 334 0 i .
SFX 334 0 imej .
SFX 334 0 imy .
SFX 334 0 itej .
SFX 334 0 iśo .
SFX 334 0 yjo .
SFX 334 0 yjom .
SFX 334 0 yjomej .
SFX 334 0 yjomy .
SFX 334 0 yjotej .
SFX 334 0 yjośo .
SFX 334 0 yjoš .
SFX 334 0 yju .
SFX 335 Y 26
SFX 335 0 a .
SFX 335 0 ach .
SFX 335 0 achmej .
SFX 335 0 achmy .
SFX 335 0 achu .
SFX 335 0 am .
SFX 335 0 ami .
SFX 335 0 ašo .
SFX 335 0 aštej .
SFX 335 0 ašćo .
SFX 335 0 e .
SFX 335 0 i .
SFX 335 0 im .
SFX 335 0 imej .
SFX 335 0 imy .
SFX 335 0 itej .
SFX 335 0 iśo .
SFX 335 0 iš .
SFX 335 0 mej .
SFX 335 0 my .
SFX 335 0 oma .
SFX 335 0 ow .
SFX 335 0 owu .
SFX 335 0 tej .
SFX 335 0 u .
SFX 335 0 śo .
