ctranslate-ol/frontend/dictionaries/dsb_DE.dic
Blachow/1,327
Bretn/1,327
Brěstow/1,327
Carnoběł/1,327
Cern/1,328
Cerwjen/1,327
Damn/1,327
Darbn/1,328
Filow/1,327
Gerašow/1,327
Grěšn/1,327
Górkošn/1,327
Gózn/1,328
Hantśilow/1,327
Herpn/1,327
Hogrozn/1,327
Holbern/1,327
Hozn/1,327
Hołtn/1,327
Jabłońscyn/1,327
Jerašow/1,327
Jurišow/1,327
Kamjenn/1,327
Kipern/1,327
Konopotn/1,327
Kopśiwn/1,327
Kowalow/1,327
Kunow/1,327
Kónjow/1,327
Kónopcyn/1,327
Kóšn/1,327
Kłodn/1,328
Kśiw/1,327
Lawkow/1,327
Lipn/1,327
Lěsn/1,327
Mrocn/1,327
Njetopyŕcyn/1,327
Nugłow/1,327
Paprotn/1,327
Parat/1,327
Pisan/1,327
Plizn/1,327
Pódwótšow/1,327
Pódzajtšn/1,327
Póleńcow/1,327
Rogacow/1,327
Rudn/1,327
Rudowat/1,327
Ryjncow/1,327
Sobotn/1,327
Sroškow/1,327
Streńkelow/1,327
Such/1,327
Swibn/1,327
Syraw/1,327
Ulanow/1,327
Wjelchn/1,327
Wjerbow/1,327
Wugrow/1,327
Wósn/1,327
barc/330
berž/330
binc/330
bjac/330
brun/1,326
byc/330
byrc/330
byńc/330
běž/330
cej/1,315
charc/330
dowuprozn/1,334
gnerc/330
gnurc/330
gus/323
gól/335
jědł/317
jěź/321
kabej/335
kak/316
kirc/330
kjarc/330
klinc/330
knorc/330
kobjel/335
kokoš/322
kokul/335
kurc/330
kuźel/335
kyrc/330
kótar/1,331
laž/330
lurc/330
mjawc/330
mjelc/330
morc/330
muc/330
mus/330
myslenc/1,327
myš/322
mórc/330
měł/319
nabubn/1,334
njebarc/330
njeberž/330
njebinc/330
njebjac/330
njebyc/330
njebyrc/330
njebyńc/330
njeběž/330
njecharc/330
njedowuprozn/1,334
njegnerc/330
njegnurc/330
njekirc/330
njekjarc/330
njekjawc/330
njeklinc/330
njeknorc/330
njekurc/330
njekwic/330
njekyrc/330
njekórc/330
njelaž/330
njelurc/330
njemjawc/330
njemjelc/330
njemorc/330
njemuc/330
njemus/330
njemórc/330
njeměrn/1,333
njenabubn/1,334
njepódlaž/330
njepódražn/1,334
njepśedlaž/330
njepśejź/329
njepśibasn/1,334
njepśisłuš/330
njepśištupc/330
njerańc/330
njeric/330
njerozraz/330
njeskjarc/330
njesmarc/330
njesyc/330
njesćinc/330
njesłyš/330
njetšurc/330
njewarc/330
njewis/330
njewuskobodn/1,334
njewyrc/330
njewól/335
njewótcuzbn/1,334
njewótzestatn/1,334
njezarz/330
njezwidobn/1,334
nješkjarc/330
nještupc/330
nještyc/330
nještync/330
nještyps/330
nješwarc/330
nješwic/330
nješwjerc/330
nješwyrc/330
nješćac/330
nješćawc/330
nješćerc/330
nješćinc/330
njeźarž/330
pjakł/317
pjer/318
pleś/325
popajźeńcnikow/1,327
pódlaž/330
pódražn/1,334
pómjatł/317
póznopóroźujuc/1,327
pśedlaž/330
pśejź/329
pśibasn/1,334
pśijěź/321
pśištupc/330
pśěźen/320
rańc/330
ric/330
rub/332
rězn/1,324
skjarc/330
smarc/330
syc/330
sćinc/330
słyš/330
tył/319
tšurc/330
warc/330
wis/330
wił/319
wuskobodn/1,334
wyrc/330
wójc/323
wól/335
wótcuzbn/1,334
wótzestatn/1,334
zwidobn/1,334
Łakom/1,327
Łužn/1,327
Śis/1,327
Śisow/1,327
śěł/317
Šejcow/1,327
škjarc/330
štupc/330
štyc/330
štync/330
štyps/330
šwarc/330
šwyrc/330
šćac/330
šćawc/330
šćinc/330
šćěp/332
źarž/330
Žołt/1,327
Žrěbjeśow/1,327
